











































AI-driven and blockchain-based cognitive 

commerce platform

WHITEPAPER v1.8

Be aware that any purchase of crypto tokens is extremely risky.

Never spend any funds that you cannot afford to lose. Make sure 

you read and understand this whitepaper, Terms of Sale and all 

possible associated risks.



PLEASE READ THIS ENTIRE SECTION AND DO NOT TAKE ANY ACTIONS UNTIL YOU FINISH IT. The 

purpose of this whitepaper is to present a summary of Eligma’s business model, value proposition 

and an introduction to the Eligma crowdsale for potential token purchasers in connection with the 

proposed token sale. The information set forth below may be changed for any reason, may not be 

exhaustive and does not imply any elements of a contractual relationship. The sale and purchase of 

ELI tokens is governed by the Terms of Sale available on the Eligma website.

If you are in any doubt as to the action you should take, you should consult your legal, financial, tax 

or other professional advisor(s) and immediately navigate away from the Eligma website and do not 

contribute to the development of Eligma.

This whitepaper does not purport to be all-inclusive or contain all information that you may desire 

in examining the project. This whitepaper’s sole purpose is to provide relevant and reasonable 

information to you in order for you to determine whether to undertake a thorough analysis of the 

project and the company with the intent of acquiring ELI tokens. PURCHASE OF ELI TOKENS INVOLVES 

A HIGH DEGREE OF RISK, AND YOU SHOULD NOT SPEND ANY FUNDS IN THIS CROWDSALE UNLESS 

YOU CAN AFFORD TO LOSE YOUR ENTIRE AMOUNT SPENT. Please refer to the Terms of Sale for a 

more comprehensive list of possible risks concerning the ELI token purchase. All information and 

content provided in this whitepaper is to be used on an “as is” basis. In making a decision to purchase 

ELI tokens, you must rely on your own examination of the project and the terms thereof, including 

the merits and all different risks involved. Prior to making a decision regarding the purchase of ELI 

tokens, you should consult your legal, financial, tax or other professional advisor(s), as to all matters 

concerning this purchase, and carefully review and consider this entire whitepaper. You and other 

prospective token purchasers are encouraged to ask questions about Eligma, its business and the 

Terms of Sale of the crowdsale, and to request such data as may be necessary to enable you to make 

an informed purchase decision.

Nothing in this whitepaper, on the Eligma website or in the Terms of Sale will be deemed to constitute 

a prospectus of any sort or a solicitation for investment, nor does it in any way pertain to an offering or 

a solicitation of an offer to buy any securities in any jurisdiction. If you decide to purchase ELI tokens, 

please note that your purchase does not involve the exchange of cryptocurrencies for any form of 

securities, investment units and/or form of ordinary or other shares in Eligma or any other company. 

Furthermore, you as an ELI token holder do not receive any form of dividend or other revenue right 

that is guaranteed or participate in profit sharing scheme nor receive any right of ownership in 

Eligma Ltd. or any right to participate in the management of Eligma Ltd. It is for these reasons that 

we believe that ELI tokens are not securities and may be purchased by anyone. If you determine that 

ELI tokens may constitute securities subject to regulation in any country, we strongly advise you not 

to acquire them and suggest you immediately notify us of the possible risks. This document is not 

composed in accordance with, and is not subject to, laws or regulations of any jurisdiction that are 

designed to protect investors.

No regulatory authority has examined or approved of any of the information set out in this whitepaper. 

No such action has been or will be taken under the laws, regulatory requirements or rules of any 

jurisdiction. The publication, distribution or dissemination of this whitepaper does not imply that the 

applicable laws, regulatory requirements or rules have been complied with. No financial information 

contained in this whitepaper has been audited.

Eligma, its founders, team members and any third party involved in Eligma project do not warrant or 

assume any legal liability arising out of or related to the accuracy, reliability, or completeness of any 

material contained in this whitepaper or any accompanied material or statements. To the maximum 

extent permitted by the applicable laws, regulations and rules, Eligma, its founders, team members 

Disclaimer and Risk Disclosure 



and any third party involved in the Eligma project will not be liable for any indirect, special, incidental, 

consequential or other losses of any kind, in tort, contract or otherwise (including but not limited 

to loss of revenue, income or profits, and loss of use or data), arising out of or in connection with 

any acceptance of or reliance on this whitepaper or any part thereof, or any accompanied material, 

statements or information provided on the Eligma website by you.

All statements, estimates, and financial information contained in this whitepaper, on the Eligma 

website, in press releases or in any other place, accessible by the public, and oral statements that may 

be made by Eligma, its founders, team members and any third party involved in the Eligma project 

and acting on behalf of Eligma, that are not statements of historical fact, constitute forward-looking 

statements or information. Such forward-looking statements or information involves known and 

unknown risks and uncertainties which may cause actual events or results to differ materially from the 

estimates or the results implied or expressed in such forward-looking statements. These statements 

may be identified by words such as “expect”, “target”, “anticipate”, “intend”, “plan”, “estimate”, 

“will”, “should”, “could”, “would”, “if”, “may”, “possible”, “project” or words of similar meaning or 

form. However, these words are not the exclusive means of identifying forward-looking statements.

The law in certain jurisdictions may restrict or limit the sale and purchase of ELI tokens. These 

jurisdictions include but are not limited to Canada, People’s Republic of China, Singapore, South 

Korea and the United States of America (including Puerto Rico, the U.S. Virgin Islands or any other 

US territories). The ELI tokens are not being offered or distributed to, as well as cannot be resold or 

otherwise alienated by their holders to, citizens of, natural and legal persons, having their habitual 

residence, location or their seat of incorporation in the country or territory listed above or where 

transactions with digital tokens are prohibited or in any manner restricted by applicable laws or 

regulations. If such restricted person purchases ELI tokens, such restricted person has done so on an 

unlawful, unauthorized and fraudulent basis and in this regard, will bear negative consequences. 

Aforesaid persons that participate in the fundraiser by providing false information about their 

citizenship, residency place and nationality, will breach the Terms of Sale of ELI tokens and would 

entitle Eligma to request such persons to compensate any damages and/or losses suffered due to this 

violation. You agree that you purchase, receive and hold the ELI tokens at your own risk and that ELI 

tokens are provided on an ‘as is’ basis without warranties of any kind, either express or implied. It is 

your responsibility to determine if you are legally allowed to purchase ELI tokens in your jurisdiction 

and whether you can then resell ELI tokens to another purchaser in any given jurisdiction. You 

bear the sole responsibility for determining or assessing the tax implications of your participation 

in the crowdsale, purchasing, or receiving and holding ELI tokens in all respects and in any relevant 

jurisdiction. You represent and warrant to us that the contributed funds do not derive from any 

illegal activity and allow us appropriate Anti-Money Laundering (AML) Checks. You understand and 

accept that we may at any time and without any explanation reject any contribution on the basis of 

simple suspicion that the funds derive from illegal acts or that AML regulation was not honoured.

This whitepaper may be updated or altered with the latest version of the whitepaper prevailing 

over previous versions. Eligma is not obligated to give you any notice of the fact or content of any 

changes. The latest version of the whitepaper in English is available at the website https://eligma.io/. 

However, there is no obligation to update, supplement or correct this whitepaper or accompanying 

materials in any respect, or otherwise to provide you with access to any additional information. 

The information contained herein may from time to time be translated into languages other than 

English or used in the course of written or verbal communications with existing and prospective 

token purchasers, customers, partners, etc. In the event of any conflicts or inconsistencies between 

such translations and communications and this official English language whitepaper, the provisions 

of this English language original document will prevail.



A word from our founder

“It’s nothing personal, it’s just business.” I strongly disagree. To me, 

entrepreneurship is a passionate belief and a personal mindset that 

can make all the difference between success and failure. It is the 

reason behind my actions, the source of my ambition, my dedication 

and my pride. And when you put so much of yourself, your time and 

your belongings in it, business becomes very personal.

Eligma is a dream I started dreaming a decade ago. Technological 

changes and rapid advancements made me think how everything around us is connected 

and how thoroughly the internet is changing the way we live. I recognized the advantages, 

but also the traps. One thing was obvious—in this era of data, consumers have too much 

to choose from and not enough time.

That is why Eligma is on a mission to connect all online commerce into a one-stop point 

and use the latest technology to help us all navigate in a consumption-oriented world. By 

harnessing AI and blockchain Eligma will act as our personal shopping assistant, giving us the 

overview of our belongings, but most of all helping us take back control and empowering 

our decision-making, which we as consumers have lost. The best thing: it will save us time 

that we all desperately lack.

Now, the dream of Eligma is becoming a reality with the help of three co-founders. We 

are all dreamers with one important distinction: we do not just imagine, but actually live 

our dreams!

Jože Mermal dreamt of an area that would connect business, entertainment, shopping, 

well-being and innovations in one place. Today, he manages BTC City—a 400,000 m2 area 

in Ljubljana with more than 10,000 brands, 3,000 companies, 450 stores, 70 bars, restaurants 

and over 20 million yearly visitors. It is one of the largest shopping areas in Europe. In a 

country with only 2 million inhabitants, his dream became a definition of innovation, open 

mindset and commerce evolution.

Matej Gregorčič’s vision made him a living legend in the blockchain community. For him, 

entrepreneurship is like a competition at the Olympic Games—years of training and dedication 

leading up to one big race to win! He is the heart and mind of Viberate, a start-up that 

became the new standard and a synonym for top-notch crowdsale projects.

My whole life is also connected to start-ups and innovations. I have lived around the world, 

doing business and improving myself in the process practically everywhere I could. The dream 

of Eligma started in Shanghai and was at the time called Crowdering. Its main goal was to 



connect people directly with factories, removing middlemen from the process. My path then 

led me to Amsterdam, where I got familiar with 3-D printing, and then to Slovenia, where I 

immediately founded the ABC accelerator. Three years after that, ABC was named the best 

start-up accelerator in Central Europe with new offices popping-up in Silicon Valley, Germany, 

Slovenia, Bosnia and Ukraine. It invested in more than 80 start-ups and raised more than 40 

million dollars to help turn the world into a better place in its own special way.

Many things need to come together for something as big as Eligma to happen. For our 

team, last summer was crucial. Talk over a coffee challenged me to stop wishing and start 

making my biggest dream a reality. It meant a big change for me, as I was the CEO of an 

amazing company and I enjoyed my job tremendously. But I knew that I was willing to let 

everything else go for Eligma. Both Matej and Jože supported me 100 % and more. Jože 

brings his invaluable knowledge, experience and the BTC City infrastructure to test Eligma 

in the real world. On the other hand, Matej lives and breathes statistics, metrics, blockchain, 

crypto, but most of all, supports me to expand my limits.

When you put us three dreamers together, you get a guarantee that something extraordinary 

is about to happen.

Dejan Roljič, CEO and founder of Eligma



Index

    1 Project overview            09
                   

 1.1 Discovery                  09

 1.2 Inventory               09

 1.3 Universal Loyalty             10

 1.4 Vision               10  

 1.5 Mission              11

     
       2 Market research           13

2.1 Market size               13

2.2 E-commerce trends              13 

2.3 Second-hand market             15

2.4 Dispersed online store ecosystem            16

2.5 Loyalty programs              17

2.6 Cryptocurrency payments             18

2.7 Conclusion               19

2.8 Main problems identified in the research           19

   
      3 Eligma             22

3.1 Discovery               22

3.2 Inventory               30

3.3 Loyalty               37

       4 Pilot project – Blockchain City         42

4.1 Online platform              42

4.2 Mobile wallet              43

4.3 User profiling              43  

4.4 Pilot project timeline             44

    5 Business model and execution plan        46

5.1 Business model              46

5.2 Project development             47

5.3 Scaling of the product             48

5.4 Project roadmap              49

   



Index

    1 Project overview            09
                   

 1.1 Discovery                  09

 1.2 Inventory               09

 1.3 Universal Loyalty             10

 1.4 Vision               10  

 1.5 Mission              11

     
       2 Market research           13

2.1 Market size               13

2.2 E-commerce trends              13 

2.3 Second-hand market             15

2.4 Dispersed online store ecosystem            16

2.5 Loyalty programs              17

2.6 Cryptocurrency payments             18

2.7 Conclusion               19

2.8 Main problems identified in the research           19

   
      3 Eligma             22

3.1 Discovery               22

3.2 Inventory               30

3.3 Loyalty               37

       4 Pilot project – Blockchain City         42

4.1 Online platform              42

4.2 Mobile wallet              43

4.3 User profiling              43  

4.4 Pilot project timeline             44

    5 Business model and execution plan        46

5.1 Business model              46

5.2 Project development             47

5.3 Scaling of the product             48

5.4 Project roadmap              49

   

   

6 Team          53 

6.1 Founders           53

6.2 Team            54

6.3 Advisors           58

   
7 Strategic partners            63
  

7.1 Microsoft            63

7.2 BTC            63

7.3 Spartan solutions          63

7.4 Netis            64

7.5 Viberate           64

7.6 ABC             64

7.7 AmaZix             65

7.8 Icecat            65

8 Token crowdsale        67

8.1 General information          67

8.2 Phase I: Public presale          68

8.3 Phase II: Public crowdsale         68

8.4 ELI token distribution          69

9 ELI funds distribution       71

9.1 Development phase distribution       71

9.2 Marketing phase distribution         72

9.3 Scaling phase distribution        73



8

Eligma will rely on artificial 
intelligence for giving you what you 
could never buy - time.



9

1 Project overview

Eligma was born as a response to several key trends and problems identified in traditional 

retail as well as online shopping, where the use of the latter has exploded in the recent 

decade. The goal of our project is to offer a set of previously impossible or unanticipated 

solutions to discover, purchase, track and resell items. This is now viable thanks to the 

development of artificial intelligence and blockchain technology.

These three main pillars, discovery, inventory and loyalty, will enable Eligma to become an 

AI-driven and blockchain-based platform that acts as a personal commerce agent.

1.1 DISCOVERY

Discovery will use a deep neural network-based product recommendation engine to find the 

best deals for products users are looking for. Through a unique algorithm that will compare 

products based on their specifications and characteristics, Eligma will also offer alternative 

solutions that match the users’ requirements. Through Eligma’s chatbot, finding the right 

product will only take seconds. There will be no need to search for products in thousands 

of online sources anymore. 

Users will be able to manage any online store account through Eligma’s unified shopping 

account. A single shopping cart and checkout process will suffice to complete purchases 

in multiple online stores at once. Users will be able to use a simple interface to authorize 

Eligma to register with selected online stores on their behalf.

Eligma’s cryptocurrency payment gateway will enable users paying with cryptocurrencies, 

even if the online store they are buying from does not support them yet.

And to round up the discovery process, Eligma will create a blockchain-tracked Digital Item 

Profile (DIP) for every item purchased through the platform, where users can store several 

records, including Proofs of Purchase.

1.2 INVENTORY

Every DIP will be automatically written into the user’s inventory. In order for the user to 

have an overview of all the items in his household, he will also be able to manually add 

elsewhere purchased items.

Within the inventory, users will be able to see the AI-predicted current and future item value. 

Eligma’s household trading agent will notify users when the best time to sell the product 

is. It will automatically generate and publish listings on selected second-hand online stores 



10

with a single click. If a user chooses to replace that product, Eligma will even propose a 

suitable replacement.

To make C2C transactions safer for the user, Eligma will offer two solutions to both trading 

parties. With its Escrow service, Eligma will act as a trusted intermediary and ensure fairness 

of contractual terms. The second option is a completely decentralized sale on the blockchain, 

where both parties will make a deposit into a smart contract as a guarantee. These deposits 

and the buyer’s payment will remain locked until the contract terms are fulfilled.

1.3 UNIVERSAL LOYALTY

With both discovery and inventory pillars established, Eligma will consolidate retailers in 

an integrated open-loop universal loyalty system and provide a simple and convenient 

user interface with a customer-centric approach. There will be no need to register with a 

standalone loyalty program of each merchant and users will be able to redeem acquired 

ELI tokens with any other network member.

Unlike the existing loyalty systems that give points, Eligma will transfer value into ELI tokens 

and credit them directly to the user’s wallet. Users will be able to earn loyalty tokens not 

only by performing certain actions on the platform, but also by making purchases at any 

other online or offline merchant, included in the program, or by simply buying them on 

an online exchange.

Although the majority of platform features will be free, some of them will only be unlocked 

with ELI tokens. With the adoption of cryptocurrencies, ELI tokens will be used for purchases 

at all merchants involved in our loyalty program.

Eligma is anticipated to become a generally recognized and accepted platform for online 

shopping. It will be entering a market, where the amount of sales reached 2.3 trillion U.S. 

dollars in 2017 and is anticipated to double in the next four years (Statista, 2018).

1.4 VISION

Eligma will serve as a jack-of-all-trades when it comes to e-business. By connecting blockchain 

and business, we will create a modular platform for commerce and save time that users 

spend on searching and purchasing products by utilizing artificial intelligence. It will advise 

users, which item to buy by taking into account item components, quality, price, shipping 

time and costs as well as other factors. It will enable users to securely and transparently sell 

their used items on multiple second-hand markets at the most appropriate time through 



11

their personal item inventories - Eligma will transform every household into a business. All of 

this will be possible thanks to the innovative use of existing AI and blockchain technologies.

1.5 MISSION

Eligma’s mission is to optimize the online shopping experience and through it help people 

save the one thing that can not be bought - time. Eligma will strive to offer transparent 

and secure C2C trades, decentralized loyalty program and help bring cryptocurrencies into 

mainstream.



Online shopping is experiencing 
rapid growth worldwide. 



13

2 Market research 

2.1 MARKET SIZE

Online shopping is one of the most popular online activities worldwide. In 2016, retail 

e-commerce sales worldwide amounted to 1.86 trillion U.S. dollars and e-retail revenues 

are projected to grow to 4.48 trillion U.S. dollars in 20211. 

2.2 E-COMMERCE TRENDS

The habit of buying products online has exploded in the recent years. There are two main 

reasons for that happening: the expansion of internet access across the world (in December 

2017, 54.4 % of the world population was using internet2) and people becoming more 

accepting of online shopping as technological changes have made it more convenient and 

easier. Online shopping does not know geographical and time boundaries. Customers can 

now place orders internationally and 24/7. The possibility to shop at any time and the ability 

to compare prices and find better deals are the main reasons consumers rather shop online 

than in physical stores3.

1 Statista, “Retail e-commerce sales worldwide from 2014 to 2021 (in billions of U.S. dollars)”, 2017

2 Miniwatts Marketing Group, “Internet World Stats”, 2018

3 KPMG International, “Global Online Consumer Report”, 2017

2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021

1 548 1 859 2 290 2 774 3 305 3 879 4 479

7.4 %
8.7 %

10.7 %

11.6 %

13.1 %

14.6 %
15.5 %

Retail e-commerce sales worldwide from 2015 to 2021 (in billions of U.S. dollars)

E-commerce share of total retail sales from 2015 to 2021



14

Reasons consumers shop online instead of in stores

The BigCommerce4 survey revealed that 67 % of Millenials and 56 % of Gen Xers prefer to 

search and purchase on e-commerce sites rather than in store. Both groups spend on average 

6 hours shopping online per week. 

Ability to shop 24/7

Convenience

Price-related

Push from offline

Ease of selection

Free shipping

Only option to buy

Price comparison

Better prices

Saving time

Convenience

Greater variety/selection

Free shipping offers

Convenience of having
everything in one place

Locating hard to find items

Avoiding crowds

Avoiding checkout lines

Products are not sold 
in my city/country

58 %

54 %

46 %

40 %

39 %

29 %

29 %

27 %

20 %

15 %

15 %

11 %

MILENNIALS

67 %
33 %

56 %
44 %

41 %
59 %

28 %
72 %

GENERATION X BABY BOOMERS SENIORS

IN-STORE ONLINE

6 6 4 2.5

HOURS PER WEEK SHOPPING ONLINE

4 BigCommerce, “Omni-Channel Retail in 2017”, January 2018.



15

2.2.1 Purchase decision

More and more people value their time and that is why online shopping is growing at such a 

high rate. Retailers are transforming their stores into showrooms and sending their customers 

to finish the purchase process online. Preferences to buy in-store vs. online are different 

amongst different categories, but with every year the percentage of online sales is growing.

Source: PwC, “Total Retail 2017”, 2017

2.3 SECOND-HAND MARKET

The second-hand market has its own specifics, but is growing rapidly. With companies like 

LetGo raising incredible amounts of money (Letgo raised $175 million U.S. dollars5) in the 

used goods segment, it is apparent that this market has a lot of potential.

However, both sellers and buyers are facing risks when performing such transactions. Even 

eBay admitted that there is something wrong, as their system was built on the assumption 

that most people are honest6. A large number of frauds are making consumers hesitant to 

sell or buy on second-hand markets as those markets are doing a poor job protecting them.

5 Techcrunch, “Letgo raises $175 million for its used goods marketplace”, January 2017.

6 The Guardian, “Ebay accused of failing its sellers as fraudulent buyers manipulate the system”, May 2017.

28 % Books, music, movies & video games

Consumer electronics & computers

Health & beauty (cosmetics)

Sports equipment/outdoor

DIY/home improvement

Furniture & homeware

Household appliances

Clothing & footwear

Jewellery & watches

Grocery

Toys

60 %

43 %

37 %

36 %

30 %

30 %

33 %

40 %

32 %

23 %

39 %

51 %

47 %

44 %

52 %

59 %

56 %

51

 

%

49 %

70 %

37 %

OnlineIn-store
Pre

fere
nce

 to 
buy

 in-s
tore

 vs.
 onl

ine



16

2.4 DISPERSED ONLINE STORE ECOSYSTEM

According to a research done by Omer Rachamim in 2014, there were 12-24 million online 

stores in the world, but only 650,000 out of them were generating annual sales of more 

than a thousand U.S. dollars8.

With all the online stores available, one of the main drawbacks is the necessity to register 

to complete a purchase. Nowadays people are losing track of stores where they are already 

registered and statistics show that 23 % of shoppers would not complete the purchase if 

they had to register again9.

To solve these problems, online retailers are trying to provide a more personalized experience, 

as it is very likely that such an experience can increase the number of purchases.

Number of online shoppers that believe it is easier to find more interesting products on 
personalized online retail stores10:

Number of online shoppers that are more likely to return to a site that recommends products10:

Consumers are embracing this; retailers are incorporating better engagement and adding a 

social component, AR and VR, machine learning, speech recognition and visual search, different 

delivery options, simplicity over complexity, blockchain technologies and cryptocurrency 

10 BILLION US DOLLARS

Annual net revenue of eBay, currently the largest used goods marketplace, 
has grown by 7 % in 2017 and has reached almost 10 billion U.S. dollars7.

7 Statista, “eBay’s annual net revenue from 2013 to 2017 (in millions of U.S. dollars)”, 2018.

8 Omer Rachamim, “How many stores are there in the world?”, December 2014.

9 VWO, “eCommerce Survey”, 2014.

10 Khalid Saleh, Invesp, “Online Shopping Personalization - Statistics and Trends”.

59 %

66 %

Number of online shoppers that believe it is easier to find more 

interesting products on personalized online retail stores:

Number of online shoppers that are more likely to return to a site 

that recommends products:

59 %

66 %

Number of online shoppers that believe it is easier to find more 

interesting products on personalized online retail stores:

Number of online shoppers that are more likely to return to a site 

that recommends products:



17

payments. More than 85 % of consumers said that they are more likely to shop with retailers 

that deliver personalized and connected cross-channel experiences. People would rather 

buy from a retailer that recognizes them and recommends options based on their previous 

purchases and their habits. Personalization is expected to undoubtedly increase sales in 

the future11.

2.5 LOYALTY PROGRAMS

While almost half of all loyalty programs are established in the retail industry, one of their 

main drawbacks is that they are not connected and not monetary by nature. All suffer from 

being too similar to others and not innovative enough. According to research, the number 

of loyalty program memberships in United States tripled in the last decade. An average 

American was a member of at least 10 different loyalty programs back in 2016, but more 

than half of those memberships remained inactive, confirming that the loyalty program 

industry is facing issues12.

Number of individual Loyalty Program Memberships in the US13

Due to the number of unconnected loyalty programs, it has become impossible for the 

average user to track them, redemption rates are low and small providers find it hard to 

cover their high operational costs.

11 Swirl Networks, Inc., “Mobile and shopping preferences”, 2015.

12 Statista, “Number of individual loyalty program memberships in the United States from 2006 to 2016 (in  

 billions)”, 2017.

13 Marketing Charts, “There Are An Estimated 3.8 Billion Individual Loyalty Program Memberships in the US.  

 More Than Half Are Inactive”, July 2017.

2006 2008

Total number of individual memberships

Percent of active memberships

1.3 B

40 %

1.8 B

44 %

2010 2012

2.1 B

2.6 B

44 %

2014

3.3 B

42 %

2016

3.8 B

46 %

YEAR

46 %



18

Credit cards

Electronic payments (PayPal)

Debit cards

Cash on delivery

Bank transfers

Gift cards or vouchers

Mobile Payments

Cryptocurrencies (Bitcoin)

 

Other

42 %

39 %

28 %

23 %

20 %

15 %

14 %

3 %

3 %

2.6 CRYPTOCURRENCY PAYMENTS

Cryptocurrencies are becoming more and more recognized amongst the wider population and 

are slowly stepping into the mainstream. According to research, credit cards remained the 

online shoppers’ preferred payment method worldwide in March 2017 and cryptocurrencies 

reached 3 %14.

Preferred payment methods of online shoppers worldwide as of March 2017

14 Statista, “Preferred payment methods of online shoppers worldwide as of March 2017”, 2017.

15 Statista, “Can you imagine using cryptocurrencies (i.e. Bitcoin) for payments?”, 2017.

16 Bloomberg, “Bitcoin Acceptance Among Retailers Is Low and Getting Lower”, 2017.

This percentage is anticipated to increase, since the last research conducted in July and 

August 2017 in Germany already showed that 11.4 % of participants are expecting to use 

cryptocurrencies for conducting payments in the future15.

One of the main reasons, why the adoption of cryptocurrency payments is slow, is the fact 

that big online merchants are not implementing this payment solution yet. As of July 2017, 

Bitcoin was accepted at just three of the top 500 online merchants16.



19

2.7 CONCLUSION

Research shows that the online shopping market is growing yearly and that people are 

already losing a lot of time searching for the right product. The offer is vast and the online 

shopping ecosystem is very dispersed. The second-hand online market is blooming and will 

probably grow even faster if certain seller and buyer security measures are implemented.

2.8 MAIN PROBLEMS IDENTIFIED IN THE RESEARCH

Online product research and shopping are time consuming

People spend a lot of time researching online to find the product and the deal that suits 

their needs, but even the most persistent ones cannot check all the online store offers. Users 

are never certain, whether they found the best possible deal.

User privacy issues

Users disclose personal data with every store, where they want to place an order. Their every 

move on the store’s website is also being monitored. This means that stores are collecting 

extensive behavioural data about each user and can connect that data directly to the person.

Registration with every online store is required

Users have to separately register with each online store they want to shop in. Due to this 

inconvenience, they can be discouraged from placing an order in a new online store. Keeping 

track of different accounts can be a hassle and therefore consumers are returning only to 

stores, where they are already registered.

Keeping track of household belongings

Users do not have an overview of what they own and how much their belongings are worth. 

Every household has many products that still have value, but are never used and people 

forget about even having them.

Creating second-hand listings for faster sale conversions

When trying to sell used items, users are having problems setting the appropriate price and 

selecting a second-hand market with the highest probability of finding potential buyers. 

Usually they list products on some of those markets and forget about the listing, as it rarely 

converts into a successful sale.



20

Payments with cryptocurrencies are not possible

With growing wealth held in cryptocurrencies, the demand for conducting payments in those 

currencies is growing. Very few online stores stepped into this direction, even though all the 

indicators are showing that in the future cryptocurrencies are going to become mainstream.

Vast number of individual loyalty programs

Big retailers have introduced loyalty programs a long time ago, but those programs are not 

connected. This means that in order for users to really benefit from a program, they have 

to keep track of every one of them, which is next to impossible. 

Incomplete or inaccurate product descriptions

Most online stores provide their own descriptions. The quality of those descriptions varies 

from store to store and it is very hard for users to know which one of them is relevant. In 

most cases, when users are searching for products with a higher price, they have to first visit 

the manufacturer’s website to find the description they can trust.

Lack of a personalized approach

Despite the adoption of new technologies, most online stores are still not embracing the 

personalized shopping experience approach. In many cases, online stores are displaying 

inappropriate products to the wrong customers and it is up to the users to browse the store 

and find the product that best suits their needs.



Eligma will offer the best quality / price 
ratio in a market consisting of billions 
of products.



22

3 Eligma

Eligma will be an AI-driven and blockchain-based cognitive commerce platform that will 

change the way people discover, purchase, track and resell items online. With its unique 

features it will offer users a “one-place”, where they can shop in all the online stores 

anywhere in the world, check the value of items in their household and learn the best time 

to sell them. Eligma will offer users a completely decentralized universal loyalty program 

and help transform every household into a business.

Eligma contains three main pillars: discovery, inventory and loyalty, described in the following 

subsections.

3.1 DISCOVERY

The first pillar of the Eligma platform is Discovery. It is the core of the platform and its 

unique AI algorithms will enable us to develop future smart solutions.

DISCOVERY

• AI-calculated item value

• Household trading agent

• Automated second hand listing

• Decentralized sale on blockchain

INVENTORY

• Universal loyalty program

• Users are rewarded for contributions

• Every merchant can join

• ELI tokens as a payment option

LOYALTY



23

BACK-END
SERVICES

MERCHANT
GATEWAY

PRODUCT
DATABASE

PRODUCT
DATA

SEARCH
ENGINE

1.

2.

CRAWLERS

API DELIVERY

3.1.1 Databases / Data Warehouse

In order to start with AI development and the machine learning process, we are initially 

building a complete architecture of the platform, which uses a high-performance database 

as a precondition.

This whole architecture is designed in a way that is able to serve an unlimited amount of 

data entries and user requests. To ensure a better presence in different markets, the platform 

will have multilingual support.

Eligma’s first building block will be a data warehouse that consists of the following elements:

• Product database;

• Online store database;

• User profile, inventory and behaviour data database;

• Purchases and Proof of Purchase database.

Architecture of Eligma’s Data Warehouse

Eligma will use a product data collection service to automatically collect and update data 

from suppliers, manufacturers, online stores and other content providers. We will introduce 

the users’ contributions feature for growing our database later.



24

3.1.1.1 Product database

Every product in our continuously growing product database has more than 300 data fields 

and the database itself is carefully categorized in accordance with the global categorization 

standard. Eligma’s database already includes more than 20 million unique products that are 

currently available on the global market.

We have partnered with the world’s leading product data provider IceCat NV from the 

Netherlands, who started the product data collection and processing in 2001. As manufacturers 

provide most of the data, Eligma will reduce the risk of false data to the minimum.

3.1.1.2 Online store database

The next step in gathering data is to connect our product database with online stores. Eligma 

has established a team of senior developers who are focused on setting up, upgrading and 

maintaining this database. Two different approaches will be used for gathering data:

• Connecting to open APIs of online stores;

• Developing parsing services to scrape the data from online stores.

Eligma will not be collecting entire datasets from online stores because some of that data 

might be incomplete or inaccurate and because we already possess the correct product data 

in our product database (such as title, description, specification, etc.). Eligma will be focused 

on collecting data, specific for each individual online store:

• Price

• Shipping countries

• Shipping options

• Shipping price

• Shipping duration

• User reviews

• Timestamp

• Warranty details

3.1.1.3 Matching algorithm

Our matching algorithm will compare the data gathered from online stores with the data 

written in the product database. When a match is found, the algorithm will create a new 

entry in the existing database. We will analyse most unmatched products using a deep 

neural network, which will help us match them based on their similarity metrics score. If the 



25

Data gathering
Gather product
information from
online stores

1 Product Matching
Search for product
information in the
Eligma product
database

2 Check Status
Product already
exists in the Eligma
product database

3 4

Check Status
Product does not
exist in the Eligma
product database

3.1

3.2

product is not found in our database, we will still collect the data and try to find a match 

manually (we will have a dedicated team for product matching). By using this method, our 

system will gain additional knowledge through the process of machine learning and thus 

improve the matching algorithm. If the manual matching is unsuccessful, we will create a 

new product in the product database and validate the input fields. Only when the validation 

is successful, will we put the product in our product database.

3.1.2 AI-driven global product discovery

At the core of the Eligma platform is an AI-driven module that will help users discover the 

best deals for desired products at any online store considering their preferences. It will 

use several sources of user data to achieve the optimum results. Eligma will also connects 

the offline and online worlds together in order to upgrade the shopping experience and 

ensure that each user really finds the best deal. We are developing the following features:



26

Current price

1000 $

User may offer

750 $

Eligma searches 

through time period

Eligma discovers the 

product

User purchases the 

product

• Global product discovery 
Our platform will display global discovery results based on the search input and 

knowledge about the user (preferences set in the profile, user behaviour data 

analytics, current inventory, location, etc.). Eligma will also suggest alternative 

products, for which the AI predicts a better-fit probability by comparing the price 

vs quality ratio and other preferences;

100 % MATCH
1400 $

89 % MATCH
1100 $

76 % MATCH
800 $

Alternative productsSearched product

• Eligma’s chatbot 
Eligma’s “on-demand” multi language chatbot will tailor simple questions to better 

refine discovery results;

• Product hunter 
Users will be able to select the product they want and define criteria under reach 

they are willing to purchase it. Eligma will perform regular lookups in all the online 

stores and when it finds the product that fits the criteria, it will notify the user and 

guide him through the purchase process;

• Code scanner
To connect online and offline shoppers, Eligma will develop a code scanning open 

source code to be used use within the Eligma mobile app or through the APIs 

implemented in any third party application. With it, users will be able to scan the 

barcode (EAN, UPC) or QR code of a product displayed in a physical store. The app 



27

SIMULTANEOUSLY SHOP
 EVERYWHERE

Amazon

eBay

Alibaba

will recognize the product using the existing Eligma`s database and provide users 

the exact description of the product and best ways to purchase the product.

• Wishlists
Wishlists are lists of items usually bought together at the same time. Eligma will 

generate these lists using smart product matching algorithms. Wishlists can also be 

generated by the community.

3.1.3 Unified online shopping account

Eligma will enable users to simply and securely connect to all the online stores and manage 

all their purchases from one unified account.

It is common for organizations today to implement a so-called unified access management, 

through which they can access many different applications to fulfil their needs. Eligma will 

implement a similar concept to enable users to manage their online store accounts. Through 

Eligma, users will be able to perform the following actions in any online store:

• Add products to their shopping cart;

• Place an order;

• Register with a new online store;

• Login to online stores;

• Make a payment;

• Update user profile information;

• Remove an account.

With this feature, Eligma will eliminate the need to memorize all the online store login 

credentials and having to jump from one online store to another to find and purchase 

everything you need. Eligma’s “one-cart” interface will enable users to add products from 

different online stores in one unified shopping cart and to only go through the checkout 

process once.



28

3.1.4 User privacy and security

User privacy and security are extremely important to us and for this reason multi-layered 

security, preventing internet-related fraud and identity theft, will be implemented inside 

the platform. All transactions will be monitored and compliant with PCI Security Standards 

enhanced with an additional cryptographic security layer.

For an even better protection of user privacy, users will be able to simply erase all the 

connections between their private information (name, last name, address) and their behavior 

with a click of a button. This means that if a user uses Eligma for all his shopping needs, all 

the available data on that user’s shopping habits will be deleted from the web, if the user 

so decides.

Eligma will be in compliance with General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) from its 

inception and user data privacy will be respected according to the required standards.

3.1.5 Cryptocurrency payments

In order to make the discovery process complete, Eligma will offer users a wide array of 

payment options. Apart from the common ones (Paypal, credit cards) we will also enable 

cryptocurrency purchases through Eligma’s internal cryptocurrency payment gateway. This 

means that users will not need to wait and hope for those online stores to implement it.

According to research, the percentage of consumers that are willing to 
pay in cryptocurrencies is increasing. Last year more than 11 % of people 
confirmed that they are expecting to use cryptocurrencies for payments in 
the future.

SECURITY: All funds will be separated to hot and cold wallets and supported by highly secure 

offsite backups.

3.1.6 Blockchain-tracked Digital Item Profile (DIP)

Items purchased on Eligma will gain a unique designated Digital Item Profile (DIP) that 

will be stored in a blockchain protected database - our implementation of a decentralised 

database that utilizes the InterPlanetary File System and is protected by the Ethereum 

network and its blockchain (sidechain). After that, hashes from the DIP will be written into 

the Ethereum blockchain. DIPs will be organized as digital containers that can store several 



29

 SIDECHAIN

SMART CONTRACT

HASH 1

HASH 2

HASH 3

...

... ...

HASH 3

HASH 2

PRODUCTS

USERS

HASH 1

ETHEREUM (MAIN) 
BLOCKCHAIN

ELIGMA
DATABASE

 DIP 1

 DIP 2

 DIP 3

BLOCK 3

BLOCK 2

TRANSACTIONS

records and references to digital documents with the information on purchase (Proof of 

Purchase), original item profile and description, repairs, warranties, resells and other events 

that can be collected and tracked.

Records inside DIPs will be stored in a time sequence and include timestamps and hash 

of the previous record, forming a small blockchain ledger of transactions inside each DIP. 

Records will also be signed with the creator’s private key, adding verifiability of the issuer 

to each record.

3.1.6.1 Proof of Purchase / Claim of Ownership

The initial document in a DIP can be either a Proof of Purchase, created automatically when 

a product is purchased through Eligma and serves as a certificate, or a Claim of Ownership 

that is created when an item is purchased elsewhere (offline or in other online stores) 

and manually added to an Item Inventory of an Eligma user. A claim of Ownership can be 

upgraded into a Proof of Purchase only if the user initiates this request and uploads the 

required documentation that will be manually verified before approval. In addition to 

information on buyer/claimer, DIPs will be able to store technical information about the 

product, alleged condition, price and other applicable information.

DIPs will be publicly accessible and browsable, enabling all Eligma users to research a history 

of each item, although some information will be encrypted and accessible only to the record’s 

creator (example: buyer ID and Proof of Purchase or Claim of Ownership). Although Eligma 

does not guarantee that all events in DIPs that follow the Proof of Purchase and are recorded 



30

or scraped from data & service providers will include truthful and accurate information, they 

can be used to create a valuable record of a digital footprint for each product.

If a user adds an item with an already existing DIP to the inventory, previous records about 

the item’s history are automatically connected. Users can also add modifications of the 

product that change expected features or condition of that item. 

3.2 INVENTORY

Our inventory module will provide an interface for recording details about the users’ personal 

belongings. In order to have an overview of all the items in a household and their value, users 

can add items to their inventory, which will be saved into a sidechain in the following ways:

• Automated inventory
After a user purchases a product through the platform, a DIP will be assigned to 

the item together with Proof of Purchase and Eligma will automatically list the item 

in the user’s inventory.

• Manual input
User can add a product that was purchased elsewhere manually through a simple 

interface. If the product is recognized and it already exists in the product database, 

Eligma will automatically fill the product data (title, description, specifications).

• Reverse inventory lookup
An online store that partners with Eligma can notify all it’s previous customers 

about creating DIP on the platform. Users will receive a mail with a link, leading to 

a simple interface for claiming Proof of Purchase.

Inventory is private to the user, unless a user chooses to share it with the 
community.

3.2.1 AI-predicted item value

Eligma’s unique machine learning software will predict the estimated current value of the 

item based on several different factors:

• Local market value;

• Local market demand;

• Age of the item;



31

• Condition of the item;

• etc.

Eligma will additionally also predict how the product value will behave in the future.

Household value
When users will have their inventory properly setup and filled with items 
they own, Eligma will be able to tell them the value of their household 
belongings in time.

3.2.2 Second-hand market

Every household will be transformed into a business

In order to fully transform households into businesses, our crucial next step will be to 

implement second-hand online stores to the platform. These stores will also be managed 

from the unified shopping account.

3.2.2.1 Household trading agent

Eligma will manage your personal belongings

By combining knowledge of the future value of the product in the household inventory and 

the replacement product`s price on the market, we will be able to predict the best time to 

sell that product and buy the replacement. This process on Eligma is fully automated via a 

trading agent that notifies the user about upcoming sell suggestions upon request.

TIME

PURCHASE TIME

BEST TIME TO SELL



32

3.2.2.2 Automated listings

One click to list your products everywhere

When a user decides to sell an item from his inventory, he will be able to create a universal 

listing, stating its condition, asking price, shipping preferences (local vs. international), payment 

options (fiat vs. crypto) and additional security options. Eligma will offer a one-click solution 

that will automatically generate and publish this listing on all selected second-hand markets.

Eligma’s unique second hand market solution will make certain steps 
much simpler, faster and more transparent. While the sale can be 
completed in a traditional manner, Eligma will offer two exclusive 
features to make the whole process safer for its users. 

3.2.2.3 Eligma as an Escrow service 

When a user will be creating listings on the platform, he will be able to select the Escrow 

service as a possible feature to conclude the deal. This service is provided by Eligma and is an 

additional precaution for both the seller and the buyer. Listings, created with this option on 

the Eligma platform, will still be pushed to other second-hand online stores and published 

there. For the time of delivery, Eligma will withhold the buyer’s payment and the seller will 

have to deposit ELI tokens as a guarantee.

All offers, insured by this feature, will be highlighted on the Eligma discovery engine, thus 

giving them an enhanced level of visibility.

In the case of a dispute, Eligma will mediate between the seller and the buyer and demand 

additional explanations and proofs that each of the parties fulfilled their part of the contract. 

Through Eligma, the order can be canceled and both the funds and the product returned 

to their original owners if the dispute cannot be solved or the purchase can be executed 

under newly agreed terms (i.e. lower price). 

The Escrow service will ensure that in the event of a dispute Eligma will act as a trusted 

intermediary and ensure fairness and observance of all contractual terms.

If the deal concludes successfully, the event is written in a DIP, a new Proof of Purchase is 

generated on the Eligma sidechain and a new hash is added to the blockchain. In the case 

of a returned item, DIP is upgraded with a flag, stating that there was a dispute regarding 

the product condition. By doing so, we prevent the seller from selling the product several 

times without changing the description of its condition.



33

Seller lists second hand offer with Escrow option and buyer accepts and pays Eligma1

SELLER

DECISION TO SELL

ESCROW OPTION

ELI DEPOSIT E

BUYER

PAYMENT

Seller sends product2

SELLER BUYER

ELIGMA

E OFFER

ELIGMA

OFFER

Buyer validates product and confirms the trade3

SELLER BUYER

ELIGMA

OFFER
TRADE CONFIRMED

PRODUCT VALIDATED

C

C

E C

Eligma releases the payment + takes Eli token for its service4

SELLER BUYER

ELIGMA

OFFER
PAYMENT RELEASE

E
C

How will Eligma Escrow service work?



34

3.2.2.4 Decentralized sale on blockchain

Eligma will additionally develop and offer a mechanism to execute a purchase or any trade 

process in a completely decentralized way using smart contracts on a blockchain.

This option will provide a tool for exchanging a payment in cryptocurrencies between a seller 

and a buyer, who previously created a trade agreement either through the Eligma platform 

or by using other means of communication, like online chat, forums or online boards.

Complete process of a product sale between a buyer and a seller will be conducted directly 

through a smart contract, meaning there is no central authority to intervene - even Eligma 

has no control over the process.

Both the buyer and the seller have to establish a motivation to successfully fulfil contract 

obligations by placing a deposit in ELI tokens. This deposit is released after the smart contract 

is concluded, forcing both parties to reach an agreement regarding the trade.

Steps for creating a smart contract:

1. Seller and buyer negotiate the deal (product, price in cryptocurrency,  shipment, 

delivery etc.) through the Eligma platform or through other communication 

channels.

2. Seller will be able to use the Eligma Decentralized Application (DAPP) to 

construct a smart contract on an Ethereum blockchain. In order to create such 

a decentralized offer, this information will have to be entered into the DAPP:  

• seller’s Ethereum public address,

• buyer’s Ethereum public address,

• payment in a cryptocurrency for the item.

3. DAPP will calculate an amount of ELI tokens, needed to be deposited by the 

seller and the buyer, proportional to the payment amount. How does the 

seller create a smart contract:

• He signs and broadcasts a transaction through a DAPP, spending a 

small amount of Ethereum (gas) and 

• deposits a corresponding amount of ELI tokens to a Smart Contract 

as a guarantee.

4. Buyer can accept the offer with depositing the below stated to the smart 

contract:

• Payment for the product in a determined cryptocurrency and 

• a matching amount of ELI tokens.



35

The result of this process is a smart contract that is fully under the control of both the seller 

and the buyer. They both are motivated to resolve the contract, as their deposits remain 

locked until they reach an agreement about closing the contract. As both parties have put 

down the deposit, it is in the  best interest of both to conclude the deal, otherwise both of 

them will lose their deposit.

Ways of resolving a smart contract:

Positive closing

Once the buyer receives the product, he will be able to confirm that the product was received 

in the expected condition by “closing” the smart contract with a confirmation transaction. 

In this case, both deposits are released and returned to the buyer’s and seller’s addresses, 

while the payment in cryptocurrency is sent to the seller’s Ethereum address.

Closing with an alternative proposal

Seller and buyer can also negotiate to close the smart contract in an alternative way by 

splitting the payment. This way, a negotiated percentage of the payment is returned to 

the buyer and the remaining percentage is transferred to the seller. Both deposits are then 

returned to their originating Ethereum addresses. Alternative closing is a convenient way 

for closing an agreement when a buyer receives the product, but it is not in an expected 

condition or has minor errors.

A proposal for an alternative closing can be set by sending a transaction to a smart contract 

from either the seller or the buyer and the counterparty must accept the proposal with a 

confirmation transaction.

Annulation

Seller and buyer can also agree to “annulate” the smart contract. In this case, the payment 

and the deposits are returned. In order to cancel the contract, a proposal must be broadcasted 

with a transaction to the network from either the seller or the buyer and the counterparty 

must accept a proposal with a confirmation transaction.



36

Seller deploys Smart Contract on Ethereum Blockchain1

SELLER SMART CONTRACT

ELI DEPOSIT E

Buyer accepts an offer2

SELLER BUYERSMART CONTRACT

ELI DEPOSIT 

PAYMENT IN CRYPTO

E
E

C

Seller ships a product and buyer confirms delivery3

SELLER BUYERSMART CONTRACT

CONFIRMATION OF 
PRODUCT DELIVERY 

SELLER SENDS THE PRODUCT

E E

C

Smart contract resolves4

SELLER BUYERSMART CONTRACT

ELI DEPOSIT 
ELI DEPOSIT 

PAYMENT IN CRYPTO

E
E

C

How will decentralized sale on a blockchain work?



37

3.3 LOYALTY

We will provide a universal loyalty program by introducing the ELI token. With both discovery 

and inventory pillars established, Eligma will consolidate merchants in an integrated open-

loop universal loyalty system and provide a simple and convenient user interface with a 

customer-centric approach. There will be no need to register with a standalone loyalty 

program of each merchant and the users will be able to redeem the acquired ELI tokens 

with any other network member.

Unlike the existing loyalty systems that give points, Eligma will transfer value into ELI tokens 

and credit them directly to the user’s wallet. The growing number of customers using ELI 

tokens and the increase of the market share of blockchain-based services and infrastructure 

will make users want to use their ELI tokens for additional purchases. Users will also be 

receiving regular reports and offers from the stores where they made their purchases, which 

will also serve to incentivize their further actions.

The main purpose of the loyalty system is to reward loyal users for actions that benefit 

the party handing out loyalty points or in our case, loyalty tokens. Eligma’s infrastructure 

will enable several parties to benefit from this program and offer users incentives for their 

involvement in the program.

ELI



38

3.3.1 Merchant to User

Merchants will have a merchant account on the platform and with it the opportunity to 

reward their loyal customers. With our tokens, merchants will be able to use common ways 

of rewarding or even be more creative when rewarding their customers. Some of those 

possibilities are:

• Every purchase is rewarded
When a customer purchases something, the merchant can give away ELI tokens as 

a “cashback” reward. This option is possible for either online or offline purchases.

Merchant’s benefit: Growing sales

• Backtrack rewarding
As the Eligma system is already gathering information about customers’ purchases, 

merchant will be able to decide he wants to reward everyone, who bought a certain 

product from him in the past.

Merchant’s benefit: Better recognition and positioning, which result in better future 

sales.

• Product rewards
Merchant can announce that every purchase of a product during a time period will 

result in an ELI token reward for the customers.

Merchant’s benefit: Better sales of a specific product he wants to promote or sell out.

 

These are just few examples, but in the future decentralized loyalty will enable merchants 

to come up with a new innovative ways to reward their loyal customers.

3.3.2 Eligma to User

The Eligma platform has different objectives when it comes to loyalty and therefore offers 

rewards on different layers to benefit the growth of the platform:

• Purchases on the Eligma platform
Eligma will reward ELI tokens for purchases through the platform.

Eligma’s benefit: More sales through the platform result in more revenue and Eligma 

will be sharing part of that revenue with the users.

• Registering on the Eligma platform
Users will receive a welcome reward in ELI tokens when registering on the platform.

Eligma’s benefit: New users.



39

• Detailed profile information
When users add additional information, Eligma will reward them with 

additional ELI tokens. A simple interface will guide users through the 

profile expansion process.

Eligma’s benefit: More information results in better platform AI predictions.

• Adding items to the inventory
Users will be awarded ELI tokens for manually adding items to their 

inventory.

Eligma’s benefit: Growing potential for second-hand trades.

• Uploading receipts
Users will be rewarded with ELI tokens when they upload receipts through 

the Eligma’s mobile app or the platform itself.

Eligma’s benefit: A growing database which results in better machine 

learning results.

• Referrals
Referral rewards will be awarded for referring new users to the platform. 

For each rewarded action that a friend carries out, the user who referred 

him will get an additional reward.

Eligma’s benefit: New users.

• User online store referral
When a user referral results in a connection of an online store with the 

platform and this online store makes its first sale through Eligma, the 

user is rewarded with ELI tokens.

Eligma’s benefit: Expanding the online store database and growing 

revenue.

3.3.3 User actions rewarding other users

• Wishlists resulting in sales
When a created wishlist results in a direct sale, the user who published 

the wishlist will be rewarded with ELI tokens.

• Social media actions
When a social media share or a post results in a direct sale, the user who 

created the post will be rewarded with ELI tokens.

Using smart contracts, we will setup a function that will release a fixed 

amount of ELI tokens daily, which will be distributed through the Eligma’s 



40

reward plans. Rewards will be adjusted to correspond to the distributed percentage.

Users will be able to withdraw ELI tokens to their private Ethereum wallets or online 

exchanges and trade with them.

3.3.4 Token usage

Although the majority of the platform features will be free, some will consume ELI tokens 

from the user’s or merchant’s balance. Users will be able to add them to their platform 

balance, either with performing rewarded actions or with a deposit of ELI tokens, bought 

on an online exchange. ELI tokens, spent for performing these actions, will be transacted 

to a fund, dedicated to reward plans.

Users will be able to utilize tokens on the Eligma platform for several purposes:

• Product hunt
When ordering a product hunt, a certain user’s balance of ELI tokens will be locked. 

If Eligma discovers a product that fulfills the user’s requirements, tokens will be 

released to Eligma and returned to the user otherwise.

• Second-hand listings
Users will have the option to push an item in their inventory to all the second-hand 

online stores, connected to our platform. Eligma will require users to utilize ELI 

tokens to perform this service. 

• Escrow fees
When a seller creates a listing and selects Escrow service as a possible feature to 

complete the sale, he will be required to deposit ELI tokens for the service.

• Decentralized Item Sale
When a seller and a buyer decide to complete an item sale in a decentralized way, 

they will have to deposit the amount of ELI tokens, equivalent to the item price, as 

a motivation to successfully fulfil contract obligations.

• Advertising
ELI tokens can be utilized for advertisement space on the platform.

• Other Eligma solutions
ELI tokens will be used for other Eligma’s solutions in both the offline and online 

worlds. The first such solutions will be the POS systems and the marketplace for 

our partner company BTC.

• Purchasing selected items
Eligma will offer a limited amount of pre-selected items, which users will be able 

to buy with ELI tokens only.



41

Eligma will use blockchain 
technology and AI to create the 
ideal customer experience. 



42

4 Pilot project - Blockchain City

Every great project needs to start small – on the appropriate testing grounds. We wanted 

a physical area with a lot of different stores, restaurants, business premises and a lot of 

people movement. It was very fortunate that we did not need to look far. BTC City lies in 

our office vicinity in Ljubljana, Slovenia and encompasses more than 10,000 brands, 3,000 

companies, 450 stores and 70 bars and restaurants. It annually hosts over 20 million visitors, 

who can also enjoy a food court, a recreation centre, a waterpark, a theatre, a cineplex, 

hotels and a casino.

We have successfully cooperated with BTC in the past and when we approached them with 

the idea, we discovered that we can write our story together–offline and online. The stars 

aligned perfectly with the name as well, so we are calling it Blockchain city and using it as 

our laboratory.

BTC is currently operating strictly offline and our first goal is to bring cryptocurrencies and 

blockchain technologies into the mainstream by creating a unified marketplace, where 

paying both with fiat and cryptocurrencies will be possible. This will simplify payment and 

business processes and enable the creation of a central warehouse, from which any item 

can be shipped.

Additionally we are enabling offline retailers to implement our POS solution that will 

combine with the mobile wallet and operate as a cryptocurrency payment processor. BTC 

City is already home to multiple blockchain companies and Eligma will expand its capabilities 

to host future blockchain companies and projects with great potential.

After successful testing, we will have enough data to transfer all the technologies and 

concepts from our testing ground to larger cities, where potential is limitless.

4.1 ONLINE PLATFORM

The first phase of the online platform is already developed and is currently operating in 

test mode. It already supports payments in some cryptocurrencies (BTC, BCH) and more will 

follow shortly.

The platform is curated by the enterprise start-up BTC and is enabling users to purchase 

products, offered by the offline retailers in the BTC area. Items offered by the retailers are 

currently limited to so called »Special deals«. Users can also browse through a complete 

catalogue of products that can be bought in the BTC City area.

 We will gradually transform the online store platform into a true marketplace of all the 

retailers that are a part of the BTC City ecosystem. At that point, the retailers will be able 

to manage their own profiles and item portfolios.



43

4.2 MOBILE WALLET

With a tailor-made mobile wallet and POS systems, we will also enable offline users to 

use cryptocurrencies as a payment option in retail stores. As the adoption of POS systems 

amongst retailers within the BTC City area is growing, it is slowly but surely becoming the 

first fully covered cryptocurrency shopping centre.

Our mobile wallet possesses all the basic functionalities of mobile wallets:

• Storage of different cryptocurrencies and tokens;

• The ability for users to transfer funds to other wallets;

• The ability for users to use it as a payment option on crypto payment-supported 

 points of sale;

• The ability for users to view the transaction archive.

Beside these functionalities, it also offers users some additional features that will help us 

gain more traction and collect more detailed and more accurate user data:

• List of stores in the BTC City area;

• Store details (opening hours, exact location, type of store, contact information, etc.);

• Simple navigation to the stores;

• Special discounts for mobile app users;

• Notifications of special deals in the BTC City area.

To create a full service solution for the retailers, our POS systems will help introduce 

cryptocurrencies to a wider public. These POS systems also accept payments with third party 

mobile wallet solutions, but their main benefit will be visible when users will pay using 

our mobile wallet, as those payments are free of transaction fees. Every purchase is also 

rewarded within our loyalty program.

Our POS system is a web-based application and can be run on all modern operating systems 

on desktop and tablet devices.

4.3 USER PROFILING

User profiling is a key ingredient in developing a strong AI algorithm for relevant search 

results. This process is growing daily and exponentially. As we will need a lot of user data 

even before Eligma’s launch, we used our partnership with BTC d.d. to develop the above-

mentioned solutions.



44

We will use both solutions to gather data on user/customer behaviour and purchasing 

habits. The platform itself will be gathering online behavioural data and the mobile wallet 

will serve for collecting offline data. This data will then be used for the machine learning 

process to produce more precise user profiling in Eligma.

4.4 PILOT PROJECT TIMELINE

Our pilot project is already in motion and we have finished the development of beta versions 

of the mobile wallet and the POS system. Our first integrations for real-life testing in retail 

stores in the BTC City area will begin in March 2018. During this testing phase, we will be 

carefully monitoring the product and making improvements where necessary. This testing 

phase will end in Q3 2018 and by then we are planning to have at least a 10 % coverage 

in the area.

In April 2018, we will launch the beta version of the online platform-BTC marketplace. 

We will be testing the platform through the summer of 2018 and then launch a national 

marketing campaign in September 2018.

We are striving to have the whole pilot product up and running in the beginning of 2019, 

with retail stores coverage of at least 30 % in the area.



45

Project roadmap presents our 
ambitions and goals on a timeline 
leading up to the year 2022.



46

5 Business model and  

 execution plan

5.1 BUSINESS MODEL

At Eligma, we will implement several business models in the B2C and C2C segments.

5.1.1 Affiliate Program

Eligma’s main revenue stream will at first come from an affiliate program that is performance-

based. While Eligma will serve as a window to all the different online stores and marketplaces 

by merging them under one roof, the affiliation program will track the sales in stores, to 

which users will be redirected and Eligma will receive a commission on those purchases. This 

module is very popular amongst sellers, since they benefit in terms of marketing, visibility, 

site visits and consequently higher sales. It enables additional marketing that is free, until 

the purchase is actually made.

Item on Amazon

Item on Ebay

Item on Alibaba

Item on Etsy Pay $

ELIGMA AMAZON



47

5.1.2 Commission-based

When Eligma implements a unified online shopping account, revenues will be made 

through a commission-based model. Digital contracts will be signed with online stores and 

marketplaces. For every order, placed through the Eligma platform, a commission will be 

charged to the seller.

5.1.3 Advertising

Eligma is entering the online retail market that is anticipated to reach 4.48 trillion in 2021. 

With a constantly growing user database, Eligma’s advertising space will lead to excellent 

ad revenue opportunities.

Eligma will offer different advertising modules according to different posting places, sizes, 

frequencies and durations. This feature will be payable with fiat currencies as well as more 

popular cryptocurrencies. When advertising will be compensated with ELI tokens, users will 

receive additional advertising rewards.

5.1.4 Third party Integration

Eligma’s product and online store database will grow exponentially by incorporating additional 

APIs, adding manual product entries and using machine learning. Database will thus soon 

become appealing for other companies. They will be able to access Eligma’s database via 

APIs in accordance with monthly agreements set.

5.2 PROJECT DEVELOPMENT

Our team is well aware of the complexity of the project, and therefore a clear project 

development plan has been set in place. Its execution will have to be very methodical, 

as we need to prepare a product that will support the scaling of server capacity and the 

product itself.

5.2.1 Wishlists / Categories

In order to focus on parsing algorithms that will provide us with updated data on products 

and online stores, we decided to test them in narrower groups called ‘wishlists’.



48

PLAN:

1. Set first wishlists for focused data collection

2. Develop AI / machine learning algorithms for those wishlists

3. Test those algorithms on the market

4. Adapt the algorithms based on real use-case tests

5. Add new wishlist / category

6. Rollout tested wishlists / categories on new markets with new online stores

5.2.2 Data growth and blockchain

Our next step in scaling the item will be including wider sets of categories and moving wishlists 

into one of the platform features. By doing so, we will expand Eligma from a narrow product 

discovery provider to a provider that will enable discovery of entire product categories.

In this phase, Eligma will already operate as a channel, where you will be able to discover 

the best deals according to your needs and will include an option to discover alternative 

products using AI algorithms. Product purchase will be completed on the seller’s website. 

In the same phase, we will also start introducing the user inventory functionality and start 

putting DIPs on the blockchain.

5.2.3 Unified online shopping account

Further in the future, Eligma will start developing an interface, where users can manage 

other online store accounts without visiting them.

5.2.4 Decentralized Loyalty program

To create a complete circle, Eligma will add a completely decentralized loyalty program, 

where users will be able to create loyalty programs with their favourite sellers, brands, 

offline stores, service providers, etc.

5.3 SCALING OF THE PRODUCT

Eligma will launch the testing phase for the product in Slovenia, where we will connect 

to about 25 online stores. During this test phase, we will gather valuable data that will be 

key for further development of the platform. We will be able to estimate the precision of 

the discovery results and the possibility of finding a better deal on some of the unlisted 

online stores.



49

Based on that data we will have the opportunity to scale in one of two ways - geographical 

scaling or precision scaling.

5.3.1 Discovery results and precision scaling

Scaling for better discovery results is very straightforward-the more sources (online stores) we 

have, the better the precision is. This kind of scaling will always be improving, as we will be 

constantly adding new sources. In addition to that, Eligma’s machine learning and artificial 

intelligence will improve with experience gained and thus provide better discovery results.

5.3.2 Geographical scaling

Slovenia will only be a testing ground to optimise Eligma for our intended market entry 

strategy. Our first target for the product launch is the United Kingdom. With taking the 

results of beta launch testing in Slovenia into account we will improve the product and use 

the following strategy for penetrating the UK market:

1. Scrape global online stores that deliver to the UK;

2. Scrape additional local online stores;

3. Adapt the product using gathered data;

4. Launch the product;

5. We will continuously keep adding additional online stores.

The same process will be used for further geographic expansion, until Eligma is present 

worldwide. 

5.4 PROJECT ROADMAP



50



51



52

Our team consists of various experts, 
who are passionate to actively 
contribute to the overall success of 
the project. 



53

6 Team

6.1 FOUNDERS

Dejan Roljič, Founder & CEO

Dejan began his entrepreneurial journey as a teenager in a successful San Francisco based 

start-up before continuing his path in Shanghai, China. There he founded a company 

focusing on the controlling process for manufacturing facilities in Asia and bulk product 

delivery. He quickly built a united controlling network of over 250 factories in China and later 

continued the company’s expansion in the EU. After returning to Europe, he founded a 3D 

printing start-up and at the same time began investing in various innovative companies. He 

later founded the ABC Accelerator, an accelerator dedicated to high-tech companies from 

the South and Central Eastern European regions with offices in Ljubljana, Silicon Valley, 

Munich, Kiev, and Sarajevo. As off today, ABC and Dejan invested in more than 80 startups 

from around the world. Dejan also co-owns a software development company with a 120 

employees. He has been involved as an advisor in several successful token sales and actively 

helped companies build their business and raise funds.

Matej Gregorčič, Co-Founder

Matej has been an entrepreneur for most of his life. He founded a marketing agency and 

took it from selling ideas in a shared office space to becoming one of the biggest event 

management agencies in Slovenia. His company won numerous awards at marketing festivals 

and did pioneering work in digital marketing back when Facebook was still considered a 

small website. Working with big international clients, his team members never missed a 

deadline. He specializes in team leadership and strategic planning, utilizing knowledge he 

gained studying mathematics and economics. He recently led the Viberate team through 

one of the most successful token sales in the region.

Jože Mermal, Co-Founder

Since 1993, Jože has been successfully managing the BTC company as the President of the 

Management Board. Based on his initiative, a BTC City-one of the largest business, shopping, 

entertainment, recreation and cultural centres in Europe was established. Spread over 

than 400,000 m2 it yearly attracts more than 20 million visitors and due to its holistic offer 

it represents a real city within the City of Ljubljana, Slovenia. Under his management BTC 

founded ABC Accelerator, Slovenian Science Foundation and the International management 

school IEDC Bled. 

Over the years BTC and Jože have been involved in more than 300 social projects (culture, 

science, education, humanitarianism and sports) that merged over 1 million different people 

and institutes. He received numerous awards for his visionary work and contribution to the 

development of business and innovative ecosystem (2017 Honorary Citizen of City Ljubljana; 

2016 Manager of SE Europe, etc.). Since 2016 Jože is also President of the Supervisory Board 

of company Krka d.d., one of the leading pharmaceutical companies in the region.



54

6.2 TEAM

Alexander Danilov, Chief Technology Officer

A world-class software engineer with more than 10 years of experience in IT and a solid 

knowledge in building web-services and development processes. He acquired most of his 

knowledge leading projects related to billing systems, data processing algorithms, user 

interface and APIs. He has a particularly deep knowledge in software architecture design 

and development of high load services. He leads with contemplative calmness.

Boštjan Mrak, Lead Machine Learning Engineer

Machine learning engineer with a deep learning specialization and software development 

background. Started his career as an enterprise software developer. One of his first projects, 

which started right before the start of the new millennium, was a product matching system, 

used for price optimization in online electronics stores. He later used that knowledge in 

building a complete eCommerce system for one of the largest sports nutrition stores in 

Slovenia. After eighteen years as a full stack software developer, he dedicated the last 

two years to applied artificial intelligencein the subfields of computer vision and natural 

language processing.

Žiga Toni, Chief Operating Officer

Serial marketing and technology entrepreneur for more than a decade. He has expanded 

his own businesses overseas to United States and helped to establish a strong presence of 

startup accelerator ABC Silicon Valley in San Jose, California. His in-depth development 

knowledge also intrigued his interest for blockchain technology and cryptocurrencies.

Timotej Polach, Chief Security Officer

System Administrator with 10 years of experience in the IT business, telecommunications 

and anti-fraud. Participating in Big Data projects as a system analyst and project manager 

helped him acquire a strong technical background of systems development life cycle, made 

him capable of seeing the big-picture and armed him with a proven ability to solve complex 

problems. He is also a licensed sports shooter with a passion for firearms.

Luka Planinc, General Counsel 

Ditched his corporate career for the excitement and diversity of startup challenges. He has 

been tackling legal matters of start-ups for the past 6 years. He co-founded 3 international 

start-ups and led the ABC Accelerator’s expansion to Germany. Specialized in corporate law, 

Luka makes sure that all companies under his watch are in proper compliance with the law. 

His latest passion are legal challenges of token sales.



55

Tomislav Mučič, Senior Blockchain Consultant

A pioneer in blockchain with decades of experience in IT security and Project Development. 

By bridging the wisdom of tradition with technology innovation he is a paramount counsel 

to token sales and businesses who recognize blockchain as a new layer of internet.

Andrej Plankar, Blockchain Business Consultant

Sees blockchain as the new digital alphabet that will rock the business world. With a degree 

in Economics, Andrej is a good connoisseur of today`s industry challenges. As an early adopter 

of the blockchain technology, he is now a prolific entrepreneur, a co-founder and advisor 

of several successful token sales, including Viberate, SportyCo and InsurePal.

Rok Babič, Senior Blockchain Developer

Rok started his tech career as a developer at a leading ERP provider in South East Europe. As 

soon as he came across the blockchain, he was hooked and spent the next years developing 

and maintaining solutions on top of Bitcoin and other altcoins. He found his true passion, 

though, with the release of Ethereum, when he started developing decentralized applications 

on top of the platform. After a few successful projects, he co-founded Spartan Solutions, a 

company that aims to become a leading decentralized solutions provider and integrator in 

the region. After successfully executing a number of decentralized solutions, Rok primarily 

focuses on promoting decentralized apps, planning the architecture of blockchain-based 

solutions and consulting startups in the blockchain space.

Luka Prašnikar, Senior Blockchain Developer

Experienced blockchain developer with several years of experience on mining operations, 

crypto payment solutions and crowdsale platforms. Armed with an extensive knowledge 

of ERP, CMS and CRM systems he tirelessly builds technology bridges between back-end 

systems and blockchain ledgers.

Matevž Caserman, Senior Blockchain Consultant

A passionate blockchain believer and a tireless analyst of business models. Started his blockchain 

career as a whitepaper copywriter, he now continues to supervise the implementation of 

new ecosystems in accordance with technological and legal limitations.

Jan Kalšek, Senior Blockchain Consultant 

Jan is an experienced blockchain consultant, specialized in supporting ICO/crowdfund 

projects in early stages of their existence. A creative brainstormer, business modeler and a 

brand developer, constantly seeking for unique approaches and solutions.



56

Ajet Redžepi, Senior Business Developer

With nearly 20 years of entrepreneurial experience in the field of sales, IT, telecommunications 

and pharmacy, Ajet contributes the invaluable competency only a seasoned professional 

can. His outstanding leadership abilities and subtle empathy keep the team together in the 

toughest times. Enthusiastic about crypto world from the very beginning and an early investor.

Mitja Hegler, Senior Business Developer

Mitja started his career by implementing post-conflict rehabilitation and development projects 

worldwide. In the last 8 years, he developed numerous strategies and implementation plans, 

gained extensive experience in raising funds and successfully managed teams in high-pressure 

and volatile situations. With strong leadership skills and a proven efficiency, Mitja joined the 

team to enrich creativity, improve partnership relations and optimize business operations. 

Jure Sobočan, Art Director and UX/UI expert

With over 10 years of experience, Jure is a seasoned graphic and UX/UI-designer who 

constantly strives to find creative solutions to visual communication problems. Currently, he is 

focusing on blockchain technology information design, making Eligma simple to understand 

and easy to use. Jure helped companies such as Bitstamp and Hive Project become more 

understandable to a wider audience.

Rok Kostanjšek, Senior Designer

Product designer with multiple design awards. Studied and graduated from Industrial Design 

& Business Economics. Founded his first start-up when he was 19 and kept his entrepreneurial 

spirit throughout.

Luka Paragi, Senior Designer

Luka is an experienced graphic and UX-designer with a passion for visual problem solving. 

Throughout his career he has worked with a range of diverse clients ranging from small 

businesses to large government projects.

Dušanka Novaković, Cognitive Scientist and Visual Communications Designer

As a cognitive scientist and designer Dušanka implements her knowledge of the mechanisms 

and processes underlying perception, memory, attention and decision-making into user 

experience design in order to achieve impact and key business objectives.



57

Sara Drašković, Head of Marketing and Communications

Sara has over 10 years of experience in the public relations and marketing. She has successfully 

led several projects and carried out numerous marketing campaigns for non-governmental 

organizations, in the public sector and in a multi-national corporation. The startup world, 

where she finds creative space and inspiration to work on projects that will have a huge 

impact on the way we do things, proved to be the right fit for her. 

Sebastjan Pirih, Digital Marketing Consultant

With a strong focus, strategic mindset and a creative talent he is outstanding in developing 

out-of-the-box digital approaches in the fields of content marketing, social media and 

creative digital.

Melita Gulja, Communications and Content Creator Consultant

A digital native with years of agency experience in public relations and communications 

projects. She is excellent in developing and executing corporate strategy whilst manage 

messaging to help building and supporting company’s unique voice and reputation.

Matjaž Šircelj, Digital PR and Social Media Consultant

Digital media and community manager strategist, consultant and public speaker with two 

decades of experience in tech companies and advertising agencies. As an experienced 

communicator, he advises international companies and token sale projects in proactively 

managing their social media presence.

Sašo Kuntarič, Content Creator and Terminology Expert

After attaining his bachelor’s degree from computer and information sciences, he decided to 

explore the fabulous world of words and letters. He has 15 years of experience in translation, 

transcreation and terminology projects for clients like Google, Adobe, Microsoft and others. 

After exploring and publishing articles regarding statistical machine translation, he turns 

his gaze to blockchain and cryptocurrencies. 

Urška Čelig, Marketing and Communications Coordinator

Urška has extensive experience in coordinating projects for the public sector and non-

governmental organizations. With her communicational, project management and 

organizational skills she will coordinate marketing projects and support our design team 

by coordinating and collating content. She is a strategic thinker with excellent interpersonal 

and communications skills who cherishes team spirit.



58

Tim Souček, Product Developer

While being challenged in many different entrepreneurship projects since he was young, 

Tim is an experienced marketing expert with specialties in international online stores. His 

true passions are creativity, the crypto world and everything digital.

Peter Roljič, Product Developer

Peter has dedicated a big part of his life to the start-up world, trying to learn everything 

and meet people from every possible industry. He knows exactly what any start-up needs 

and who to call to proceed smoothly. He has gained extensive experience in leadership and 

sales. He is a true team player and decorated with many different awards.

+ 8  additional senior developers               + 3  data scientists

6.3 ADVISORS

Charlie Shrem

Charlie is an American entrepreneur and Bitcoin advocate. He is a founding member of the 

Bitcoin Foundation, an organization promoting the use of Bitcoin for the benefit of users 

worldwide. He is one of the most influential people in the blockchain community, advising 

many highly successful token sale campaigns.

Andy Baynes, MSc 

A consummate visionary and conductor of high impact strategies in a career that spans 

Sony, Apple and Nest-Google-Alphabet. He has almost 20 years of managerial experience, 

during which he worked directly with Steve Jobs, Tim Cook, Tony Fadell, Matt Rogers and 

thus built executive and operational experience across a range of business functions. Andy 

served as an advisor to many early stage technology companies and has lectured at Stanford 

University, Berkeley Haas and Middlebury Institute for International Studies. 

Hermann Eul, PhD

Seasoned top executive with background in telecommunications, automotive, industry, and 

security. Member of the Management Board of Infineon Technologies AG (CTO & CMO), 

Corporate Vice President of Intel Corp, USA, and President & Managing Director of Intel 

Deutschland GmbH and a business angel.



59

Gary Dillabough

Managing Partner at Navitas Capital also serving as either a board director or observer on 

several boards. He was previously a Managing Partner at Westly Group, a board member 

of SCL Elements (Schneider Electric) and served in numerous roles at eBay for 10 years, as 

VP - Strategic Partnerships and later as GM - Sustainability.

Jeff Arrillaga

Executive Managing Director at the reputable Newmark Knight Frank and a member of the 

Association of Silicon Valley Brokers Hall of Fame. Jeff has immense experience with doing 

business at the highest levels in Silicon Valley.

Maja Mikek

Maja is a co-founder and Chief Financial Officer at Celtra, which she co-built from the ground 

up, helping to scale the business to its current success. She is a master of planning and 

managing companies’ financial resources while balancing bold investments with profitable 

end year results. Prior to Celtra, she headed marketing at the Elektronček group, the world’s 

leading manufacturer of electromechanical gaming devices. She was also a CRM Manager 

for Simobil, one of the largest mobile operators in Slovenia. She obtained an MBA degree 

(with honours) from Babson College, often ranked as the most prestigious entrepreneurship 

college in the USA.

Jure Leskovec, PhD 

PhD in Machine Learning from Carnegie Mellon University, an Associate Professor of Computer 

Science at Stanford University and Chief Scientist at Pinterest, leading Pinterest Labs. Jure’s 

specialties are artificial intelligence, machine learning, data mining, social networks, text 

and web mining, with special emphasis on applications of machine learning.

Nick Zaharias 

A passionate leader and entrepreneur with more than two decades of experience in 

building innovative and high-growth businesses. Nick serves as an Investor and Advisor at 

280 CapMarkets and is the former Managing Director at SignalFire and Managing Partner 

at Check Group LLC.

Herman Gyr, PhD

Herman is a founding partner of the Enterprise Development Group (EDG) and creator of the 

Innovation Blueprint, a model for engaging leaders in the transformation of their enterprise. 

He ran projects throughout the USA, Europe, Asia, South America and South Africa.



60

Ana Lukner Roljič, MSc

Ana is an internationally recognized entrepreneur and a visionary, passionate motivator and 

corporate culture builder. She is considered one of the most influential women for the future 

and is currently the managing director at ABC Silicon Valley. Ms. Lukner founded Ana’s Little 

Star - the biggest and transparent non-profit organization in Slovenia, which is also active 

in California. She is an adept network builder, actively building a ‘’bridge’’ between Silicon 

Valley and Europe. Ana draws her inspiration from her patented life philosophy TruHoMa 

(True & Honest Mankind), now also becoming a global movement.

Sunny Saini

Sunny is a Commodity Manager at Google, responsible for supplier sourcing and performance 

management. Sunny is a key part of an end-to-end supply chain team that drives continuous 

improvement and ensures operational excellence in support of Google’s rapid growth.

Peter M. Moricz

Peter successfully navigated through some of the most severe financial crises of our time and 

developed a great expertise and reputation for effectively managing risk. His derivatives 

product knowledge is diverse, having spent over 20 years trading US and European Fixed 

Income, FX, equity indexes, crude oil and gold futures. Recently Peter’s career has focused 

on risk and compliance issues. Between 2014 and 2016 he was Vice President at JP Morgan 

Private Bank in London, where he was responsible for compliance with all US, UK and EU 

regulatory requirements, leading sales and execution supervision in line with industry 

standards. He also worked with Regtech, Fintech companies and Co-Founded a Trade Finance 

Blockchain company called ChainX.

Mihael Mikek 

Mihael is founder and CEO of Celtra, a creative management platform for digital advertising. 

He has been its Chief Executive Officer and President since June 2006. He co-founded several 

companies in diverse industries such as IT, medical services and sports.

Mark Pleško, PhD

A prodigy nuclear physicist (co-discovery of matter turning into antimatter) and angel investor 

into another token sale company, Viberate. Mark is more than just an angel investor; he is 

actively involved in company’s strategic planning as well as day-to-day operation.

He is also the main founder and CEO of the high tech company Cosylab that is the world 

leader in large nuclear accelerator control systems, with yearly profit margins exceeding 

30-40 %. Among Cosylab’s customers are the world’s largest national laboratories and 



61

international projects, such as CERN, the international fusion project ITER, SLAC at University 

of Stanford and KEK in Japan and several novel cancer treatment centers worldwide, which 

use protons and Carbon ion accelerators to kill cancer tumors with submillimeter precision.



62

Our project is backed by five 
strategic founding partners.



63

7 Strategic partners 

Alongside our experienced team, the project is backed by majorly relevant stakeholders and 

other respected partners. They all bring their know-how to the process of making Eligma 

a world-class undertaking. Our founding partners are one of the largest and most diverse 

shopping centers, a global start-up accelerator, a growing company that closed an extremely 

successful crowdfunding campaign and two leading blockchain development companies 

with extensive experience in token sale projects.

7.1 MICROSOFT

As a visionary of both long-term and short-term top-notch technological solutions, Microsoft 

stands unchallenged; its partnership represents a major step towards the fulfillment of 

Eligma’s goals, especially in the AI domain. Microsoft is a multinational technology company 

that develops, manufactures, licenses, supports and sells computer software, consumer 

electronics, personal computers, and services. As of 2016, it is the world’s largest software 

maker by revenue, and one of the world’s most valuable companies.

In recent years, Microsoft has dedicated special attention to machine learning and AI 

product efforts. Microsoft has a wealth of know-how built up over the years, and Eligma 

can leverage this into fine-tuning its AI algorithms to deliver the best service possible to 

those who will use its platform.

7.2 BTC

The big vote of confidence for Eligma is the support and engagement of one of the largest 

and most diverse shopping, business, entertainment and leisure centres in Europe, BTC. BTC 

enterprise is a unique company with over 60 years of tradition and visionary leadership, with 

which it obtained a leading position in commercial property development and logistics in 

the region. It is best known for its BTC City – a city within a city of Ljubljana with its own 

Living Lab and ABC Accelerator.

BTC City represents a unique smart city with more than 450 stores, covering 10,000 brands, 

3,000 companies, 70 bars and restaurants, a food market, 8,500 parking spots, a recreation 

centre and a waterpark, a theatre and a cineplex, hotels, a casino and many more. In 

addition to their rich business area, they are also extremely proud to be a part of Outfit 7’s 

success story, which was the first Slovenian unicorn. Furthermore, BTC manages close to 1 

million square meters of retail space. In 2017 alone, their Logistics department prepared 

and commissioned 585,605 pallets.



6417  Title awarded by CESA - Central European Startup Awards in 2017.

7.3 SPARTAN SOLUTIONS

Spartan Solutions is a blockchain development company, dedicated to creating and supporting 

innovative and unique ecosystems for blockchain-based projects. Many successful token 

sale projects used their consultancy and development services that include implementing 

token and business models and reviews, UI & UX design, creating and testing customized 

smart contracts, cross-blockchain migrations and community and communications channel 

support. Their full-stack support is a valuable addition to every blockchain project in their 

pre- or post-token sale stage. Active involvement, reviews and contributions from Spartan 

Solutions’ employees is one of the most important proofs that Eligma’s progress is one to 

watch.

7.4 NETIS

Netis is an innovation blockchain lab and a consultancy, specialized in cohesive solutions 

for businesses, seeking a competitive edge by using blockchain-based technology. A 

close-knit team of experts with years of experience in the crypto world is giving business 

partners a unique crypto market insight and a paramount network of most appreciated 

crypto professional. For Eligma, the team will bridge a wisdom of tradition with blockchain 

innovation accompanied with strategic advisory and implementation.

7.5 VIBERATE

The accumulated know-how of our team is enriched with our fourth partner Viberate - a 

successfully crowdsourced live-music ecosystem and a blockchain-based marketplace, where 

music professionals and music lovers do business with one another directly.

They were founded and are managed by music industry veterans and now employ more 

than 60 people and are supported by the 2-time Grammy-Award winner Imogen Heap. They 

were the talk of the token sale community when they successfully raised 10.7 million U.S. 

dollars in 4 minutes 42 seconds with their token sale in September 2017.

7.6 ABC

We draw our determination for Eligma’s success from our strategic partner, the Best Accelerator 

in 2017, the ABC Accelerator17. With several years of tradition and success stories, it has so 

far helped accelerate 84 startups, including Viberate, Symvaro, Facility, Nervteh, Appray, 

FruttaWeb, Hotailor, Panorganic, Kraftpal and SmartISCity to name just a few.



65

With offices in Silicon Valley U.S., Germany, Slovenia and Ukraine, ABC has reached global 

recognition and partners such as IBM, Microsoft, Cisco, Oracle, BMW, Amazon Web Services, 

BTC City, Petrol, Zavarovalnica Triglav, Telekom Slovenija, Lidl and many others. ABC has 

established itself as Slovenia’s premier start-up accelerator, attracting the finest talent from 

home and abroad. Through collaboration with other accelerators and support of Harvard, 

Berkeley and Stanford University as well others, ABC is offering us a very wide network and 

unique access to potential customers and partners, as well as contributing their investment 

and enabling a push to the global market, which is crucial for our big scale success.

7.7 AMAZIX

Amazix are a group of professional crypto ICO consultants who have technical expertise and 

offer excellent support. Led by an elite team of managers, they provide a turnkey service 

to crypto projects based on Bancor or on the Ethereum Network.

7.8 ICECAT

Icecat is an independent worldwide syndicator of e-commerce product content and product 

statistics. It is part of the iMerge e-commerce group.

Icecat produced millions of product data-sheets in all world languages and analyzes the 

performance of thousands of brands. Its statistics are based on billions of annual product 

data-sheets downloads by tens of thousands connected e-commerce websites: online shops, 

ERP systems, comparison sites, purchase systems, rating portals, and other applications. 

Data is stored in one single standardized format, which facilitates easy categorizing, filtering, 

searching and comparing of the products. It offers  very flexible data creation process and 

the possibility of further expansion to different product groups with high quality standards, 

high level of localization and consistency.



66

Eligma token (ELI) crowdsale starts 
on 17 April 2018.



67

8 Token Crowdsale

8.1 GENERAL INFORMATION

• Eligma token (code: ELI) is a fully ERC-20 compliant Ethereum utility token and 

will be available in exchange for Ethereum (ETH) contributions

• Total number of ELI Tokens that will be generated during the Token Generation 

Event (TGE): 500,000,00018 ELI

• Number of ELI Tokens that will be distributed during the whole Token 

Crowdsale process: 300,000,000 ELI (60 %)

• Target sum of contributions in the Token Presale process (hard cap): 22,900 ETH

• Target sum of contributions in the entire Token Crowdsale process (hard cap): 

34,180 ETH

• Minimum sum of contributions (soft cap): ETH in equivalent of 3,000,000 U.S. 

dollars

• Offered Token exchange ratio: 1 ELI = 0.1 U.S. dollars

• ETH/USD exchange rate: 1 ETH = 800 USD

Details:

The Know Your Customer (KYC) procedure, where contributors disclose their personal 

information, is mandatory in both phases before the contribution.

If the equivalent value of all contributions will not reach the soft cap, all contributions will 

be returned to the contributors’ Ethereum addresses.

Excess contributions in ETH, received after the individual phase hard cap is reached, will be 

bounced or returned to the contributing Ethereum addresses, reduced by the transactional 

costs (gas).

Contributors should NOT contribute ETH directly from online exchanges, as ELI tokens will 

be returned directly to those contributing address, which might not be able to accommodate 

our tokens. All contributors MUST contribute ETH from their private Ethereum wallets.

All dates are in the format: DD.MM.YYYY

For more information, please refer to the Terms of Sale available on our website  

https://www.eligma.io.

18  This is a total number of all ELI tokens in existence. There will be no later issuance of ELI tokens. 



68

8.2 PHASE I: PUBLIC PRESALE

This phase is dedicated to our close Community members and early contributors that will 

be able to obtain ELI tokens. We want to ensure that our ELI tokens will be well distributed 

among long-term supporters and users of our platform. 

Phase duration: 20.3.2018 12:00:00 UTC - 10.4.2018 11:00:00 UTC or until the cap of 22,900 

ETH is reached

Phase bonus: 15 % of additional ELI Tokens for all accepted contributions

Eligma however reserves the right to introduce an invite-only Private Presale contribution 

period, where the bonus for the duration of the Private Presale contribution period may 

be higher (at Eligma’s discretion). The ELI Tokens distributed during the Private Presale 

contribution period will not exceed 50% of all the available ELI Tokens assigned to the 

contributors. 

Target amount of distributed ELI Tokens: 216,000,000 ELI

Minimum contribution: 0.1 ETH

Maximum contribution: 80 ETH

Contributors will receive their ELI tokens by the time our crowdsale starts, but those tokens 

will be locked for the duration of the crowdsale and for a short confirmation period, in 

which we will check if the token distribution in all phases executed correctly. After successful 

validation of the process, all tokens will be unlocked and become transferable.

8.3 PHASE II: PUBLIC CROWDSALE

This phase is dedicated to the general public, HNWIs and small contributors.

Phase duration: 17.4.2018 11:00:00 UTC - 8.5.2018 11:00:00 UTC or until the hard cap is reached

Phase bonuses: 

• 8 % of additional tokens for the first 20 mio. ELI tokens

• 6 % of additional tokens for the second 20 mio. ELI tokens

• 4 % of additional tokens for the third 20 mio. ELI tokens

• 2 % of additional tokens for the fourth 20 mio. ELI tokens

• 0 % for remaining tokens



69

Target amount of distributed ELI tokens: 84,000,000 ELI + unsold tokens from presale

Minimum contribution: 0.1 ETH

Maximum contribution: 10 ETH in the first three hours, after that the limit will be removed

Contributors will receive their tokens immediately after we receive their ETH contributions, 

however those tokens will be locked for the duration of the crowdsale and for a short 

confirmation period, in which we will check if the token distribution in all phases executed 

correctly. After successful validation of the process, all tokens will be unlocked and become 

transferable.

8.4 ELI TOKEN DISTRIBUTION

There are tokens that will have a vesting period according to the following 
schedule:

• Tokens allocated to the team will have a vesting period of 2 years;

• Tokens allocated to the advisors will have a vesting period of 2 years;

• Tokens allocated to the future partners will have a vesting period of 3 years;

• Tokens allocated to the community and user growth will not have a vesting 

period.

60 %
Crowdsale

12 %
Community and

user growth 4 %
Future partners

5 %
Advisors

19 %
Eligma team

ELI



70

For the purpose of prosperous 
execution of Eligma project, all funds 
will be strategically distributed.



71

5 %
Daily operations

8 M $

5 %
Marketing

10 %
Growing our

database

10 %
Non-technical
development

70 %
Development

9 ELI Funds distribution

Our funds distribution will be divided into three groups:

• First phase - Development: 8,000,000 U.S. dollars

• Second phase - Scaling: 8,000,000 U.S. dollars

• Third phase - Marketing: 8,000,000 U.S. dollars

9.1 DEVELOPMENT PHASE DISTRIBUTION

• 70 % of contributions will cover the technical development costs of the platform;

• 10 % of contributions will cover the costs of non-technical product development, 

including project management, team management and business development;

• 10 % of contributions will cover the costs of adding new online stores into the 

database and internally curating existing ones;

• 5 % of contributions will fund the first marketing phase, covering basic 

marketing operations, including advertising campaigns for user acquisition and 

branding;

• 5 % of contributions will cover day-to-day operations, office rent, office 

equipment, travel expenses and legal fees.



72

9.2 MARKETING PHASE DISTRIBUTION

• 25 % of contributions will cover the costs of direct sales to our target audiences, 

including direct calls and personal meetings;

• 15 % of contributions will cover the costs of negotiating partnerships with 

additional online stores, including personal meetings;

• 15 % of contributions will finance a global, ongoing PR campaign, targeted 

towards specialized and mainstream media;

• 45 % of contributions will cover the costs of an ongoing global ad campaign 

covering all relevant media outlets, designed to increase our user database and 

assure platform liquidity.

15 %
PR

8 M $

45 %
Marketing

25 %
Business development

15 %
Partnership
negotiations



73

9.3 SCALING PHASE DISTRIBUTION

• 30 % of contributions will cover the technical development costs of adding 

online stores from new markets into the database as well as adding additional 

languages;

• 10 % of contributions will cover the costs of non-technical product development, 

connected directly to the global scaling of the product;

• 15 % of contributions will cover additional travel expenses and setting up offices 

in new markets;

• 10 % of contributions will cover the costs of negotiating partnerships with 

additional online stores, including personal meetings;

• 25 % of contributions will fund the marketing on new markets, including 

advertising campaigns for user acquisition and branding;

• 10 % of contributions will cover day-to-day operations, office rent, office 

equipment, travel expenses and legal fees.

8 M $

10 %
Daily operations

25 %
Marketing

10 %
Business

development 15 %
Opening
new markets

10 %
Non-technical
development

30 %
Development




